Virginia statutes. Title 30. General Assembly.
Chapter 45. Virginia Bicentennial of the American War of 1812 Commission.

§§ 30-293 through 30-300.

Expired.

Editor’s note.

Chapter 45 (§§ 30-293 through 30-300), which established the Virginia Bicentennial of the American War of 1812 Commission, has expired. Although this section was to expire July 1, 2015, pursuant to the terms of § 30-300, funding for the Virginia Bicentennial of the American War of 1812 Commission was funded by Acts 2016, c. 780, Item 24, but the item was struck through by Acts 2017, c. 836.